Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,115
Special needs trusts; applicability of rules and regulations.

Any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by a state agency regarding pooled special needs trusts shall apply only to those trust beneficiaries who are residents of the state or who receive governmental benefits funded by the state.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 79.